Utah statutes.
16-10a-125.   Filing duty of division.

(1)  If a document delivered to the division for filing satisfies the requirements of Section 16-10a-120, the division shall file it.

(2)  The division files a document by stamping or otherwise endorsing "Filed" together with the name of the division and the date and time of acceptance for filing on both the document and the accompanying copy. After filing a document, except as provided in Sections 16-10a-1510 and 16-10a-1608, the division shall deliver the accompanying copy, with the receipt for any filing fees, to the domestic or foreign corporation for which the filing is made, or its representative, at the address indicated on the filing, or at the address the division determines to be appropriate.

(3)  If the division refuses to file a document, it shall return the document to the person requesting the filing within 10 days after the document was delivered to the division, together with a written notice providing a brief explanation of the reason for the refusal.

(4)  The division's duty to file documents under this section is ministerial.  Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the division's filing or refusal to file a document does not:

(a)  affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or part;

(b)  relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

(c)  create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

